Arkansas, session 2025, HB1657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Uncodified Acts 2021, No. 594, § 2(7), concerning the
legislative findings for Acts 2021, No. 594, is amended to read as follows:
(7) In order to attract and maintain industry to use the
available fiber resources, support healthy timberland, encourage capital
investment in the Arkansas timber industry, and provide well-paying jobs, and
use wood byproducts for the production of energy, the creation of a logging
and wood fiber transportation job creation income tax credit should be
established.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2702 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-2702. Legislative purpose and intent.
The purpose and intent of this subchapter is to increase capacity in
*JLL143*
04-02-2025 10:14:20 JLL143

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1657
the state for the use of sawmill mill residuals, including sawdust and wood
chips, wood byproducts, including bark, and thinnings to maintain a healthy
forest, unwanted treetops, and damaged or diseased trees not wanted by
sawmills.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2703(6) and (7), concerning the
definitions to be used under the Arkansas Wood Energy Products and Forest
Maintenance Income Tax Credit, are amended to read as follows:
(6) “Qualified wood energy products and forest maintenance
project” means a project specified in the incentive agreement to include one
(1) or more Arkansas facilities in the same ownership group:
(A) For which the taxpayer commenced construction by the
date specified in the incentive agreement, but no earlier than January 1,
2020;
(B) That supports the Arkansas timber industry by using
low-value wood, including without limitation sawmill mill residuals, forest
thinnings, unwanted treetops, and damaged or diseased trees, and wood
byproducts, including bark, to produce high-efficiency, high-energy wood
energy products;
(C) In which the taxpayer has a total projected investment
in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000);
(D) That is undertaken by a taxpayer who has entered into
an incentive agreement with the State of Arkansas in which the taxpayer
commits to creating at least one hundred (100) four hundred (400) net new
full-time permanent employees with an average annual wage of at least sixty
thousand dollars ($60,000);
(E) That will provide a positive cost-benefit analysis to
the state as determined by the commission and the Office of Economic Analysis
and Tax Research;
(F) That is certified as having a closing date before
December 31, 2023 June 30, 2028, for all facilities, by which the taxpayer
has certified and the state has verified that necessary capital acquisition
and borrowing for the facilities has occurred to ensure that funds will be
available to:
(i) Secure a site for the facilities;
04-02-2025 10:14:20 JLL143

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1657
(ii) Obtain engineering services for the facilities;
(iii) Purchase equipment for the facilities; and
(iv) Commence construction on the facilities; and
(G) That is undertaken by a taxpayer that has elected by
agreement with the State of Arkansas for the taxpayer's facilities to be
classified as a qualified wood energy products and forest maintenance
project; and
(7)(A) “Wood energy products equipment” means:
(i) New or used machinery or equipment located in
Arkansas on the last day of the taxable year that is operated or used
exclusively in Arkansas to collect, separate, treat, pulverize, dry, modify,
or convert wood fiber and wood byproducts, including bark, so the resulting
product may be used as a raw material, for productive energy use, or to
manufacture other materials;
(ii) Devices that are directly connected with or are
an integral and necessary part of machinery or equipment operated or used
exclusively in Arkansas to collect, separate, treat, pulverize, dry, modify,
or convert wood fiber and wood byproducts, including bark, and are necessary
for the collection, separation, treatment, pulverization, drying,
modification, or manufacturing of wood fiber;
(iii) Equipment that produces energy with wood
power; and
(iv) A device that is directly connected with or is
an integral and necessary part of machinery or equipment operated or used
exclusively in Arkansas to produce energy with wood power.
(B) “Wood energy products equipment” does not include a
vehicle or trailer that is licensed or that normally would be licensed for
use on highways in Arkansas.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2704(a), concerning the Arkansas Wood
Energy Products and Forest Maintenance Income Tax Credit, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) There is allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by this
chapter in an amount equal to thirty percent (30%) twenty percent (20%) of
the costs of wood energy products equipment purchased for use in Arkansas
after the date specified in the incentive agreement by a taxpayer that:
04-02-2025 10:14:20 JLL143

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1657
(1) Is engaged in the business of collecting, separating,
treating, pulverizing, drying, modifying, or manufacturing wood energy
products and wood byproducts, including bark; and
(2) Has been certified as owning a qualified wood energy
products and forest maintenance project or a qualified wood energy products
and forest maintenance expansion project.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2704(b)(2)(B), concerning the
Arkansas Wood Energy Products and Forest Maintenance Income Tax Credit, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) Beginning July 1, 2021 2026, and by July 15 of each
subsequent year, a taxpayer shall provide notice to the Department of Finance
and Administration of the amount of tax credits, including without limitation
tax credits the taxpayer expects will receive certification during the fiscal
year by the Department of Energy and Environment, subject to the limitation
in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, that will be sold or transferred for
value.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2704(c)(7), concerning the Arkansas
Wood Energy Products and Forest Maintenance Income Tax Credit, is amended to
read as follows:
(7) Beginning July 1, 2021 2026, by July 15 of each year, a
public retirement system with possession and control of tax credits under
this subsection shall provide notice to the Department of Finance and
Administration of the amount of tax credits, including without limitation tax
credits the public retirement system expects will receive certification
during the fiscal year by the Department of Energy and Environment, subject
to the limitations in subdivisions (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section, to be
sold or transferred for value.

SECTION 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-6 of this act are effective for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

/s/Beck


04-02-2025 10:14:20 JLL143